indomorph/hin/verbs.lexc
!!!verbs.lexc for Hindi!!!
Multichar_Symbols
!Guessed stem
^GUESSVERBSTEM
!Morphological properties
+V
+1st +2nd +3rd
+Masc +Fem +Sg +Pl
+Inf ! Infinitive
+Perf +Imp ! Perfective/imperfective
+Part ! Participle
+Subj +Fut ! Subjunctive, Future
+Imprt +Int +Fam +Hon ! Imperative, Intimate, Familiar, Honorific

LEXICON Root
VerbStem ;

LEXICON Suffix
+V:0 VerbSuffix ;

LEXICON VerbSuffix
+Inf:^ना # ; ! -naː
+Part+Perf:0 PerfectivePrc ;
+Part+Imp:0 ImperfectivePrc ;
+Subj:0 Subjunctive ;
+Fut:0 Future ;
+Imprt:0 Imperative ;

LEXICON PerfectivePrc
+Sg+Masc:^आ # ; ! -aː
+Pl+Masc:^ए # ; ! -e
+Sg+Fem:^ई # ; ! -iː
+Pl+Fem:^ई # ; ! -iːn

LEXICON ImperfectivePrc
+Sg+Masc:^ता # ; ! -taː
+Pl+Masc:^ते # ; ! -te
+Sg+Fem:^ती # ; ! -tiː
+Pl+Fem:^ती # ; ! -tiː
+Pl+Fem:^तीं # ; ! -tiːn ! when no auxiliary follows

LEXICON Subjunctive
+1st+Sg:^ऊँ # ; ! -ũː
+2nd+Int+Sg:^ए # ; ! -e
+3rd+Sg:^ए # ; ! -e
+1st+Pl:^एँ # ; ! -ẽ
+2nd+Fam+Sg:^ओ # ; ! -o
+2nd+Hon+Sg:^एँ # ; ! -ẽ
+3rd+Pl:^एँ # ; ! -ẽ

LEXICON Future
+1st:^ऊँ FutureEnd ; ! -ũː
+2nd+Int:^ए FutureEnd ; ! -e
+3rd:^ए FutureEnd ; ! -e
+1st:^एँ FutureEnd ; ! -ẽ
+2nd+Fam:^ओ FutureEnd ; ! -o
+2nd+Hon:^एँ FutureEnd ; ! -ẽ
+3rd:^एँ FutureEnd ; ! -ẽ

LEXICON FutureEnd
+Sg+Masc:गा # ; ! -ɡaː
+Pl+Masc:गे # ; ! -ɡe
+Sg+Fem:गी # ; ! -ɡiː
+Pl+Fem:गी # ; ! -ɡiː

LEXICON Imperative
+Int:0 # ;
+Fam:^ओ # ; ! -o
+Hon:^इए # ; ! -ie
+Hon:^इये # ; ! -ije
+Hon:^इएगा # ; ! -ieɡaː
+Hon:^इयेगा # ; ! -ijeɡaː

LEXICON VerbStem
अपना Suffix ; ! /apnaː-naː/ calculate, come round
आ Suffix ; ! /aː-naː/ grow, grow out of
इतरा Suffix ; ! /itraː-naː/ pride, tout
उखाड़ Suffix ; ! /ukʰaːɽ-naː/ jerk, stub
उगलवा Suffix ; ! /uɡləvaː-naː/ prise out
उछाल Suffix ; ! /ut͡ʃʰaːl-naː/ flip, kick up
उड़ Suffix ; ! /uɽ-naː/ flight, take off
उतर Suffix ; ! /utrə-naː/ alight, land
उपज Suffix ; ! /upd͡ʒə-naː/ carry, born
उबार Suffix ; ! /ubaːr-naː/ bail <somebody> out
उभार Suffix ; ! /ub̤aːr-naː/ rake up, set off
उलझ Suffix ; ! /uld͡ʒ̤ə-naː/ lock, bog down
ए Suffix ; ! /e-naː/ draw breath
कट Suffix ; ! /kəʈ-naː/ cut, cut off
क Suffix ; ! /kə-naː/ get out
करवा Suffix ; ! /kərvaː-naː/ get
कह Suffix ; ! /kəɦ-naː/ drop, speak up for
कांप Suffix ; ! /kaːmp-naː/ quake
कुड़कुड़ा Suffix ; ! /kuɽkuɽaː-naː/ cackle
कुलबुला Suffix ; ! /kulbulaː-naː/ wiggle
कोस Suffix ; ! /kos-naː/ curse, rail against
खनका Suffix ; ! /kʰənkaː-naː/ chink
खरोंच Suffix ; ! /kʰəroɲt͡ʃ-naː/ score, scratch around
खिल Suffix ; ! /kʰil-naː/ bear, burst
खिंच Suffix ; ! /kʰiɲt͡ʃ-naː/ chalk, gravitate
खींच Suffix ; ! /kʰiːɲt͡ʃ-naː/ tug, strain
खुलवा Suffix ; ! /kʰulvaː-naː/ draw
खोद Suffix ; ! /kʰod-naː/ scratch, spade
खंगाल Suffix ; ! /kʰəŋɡaːl-naː/ swill
गढ़ Suffix ; ! /ɡəɽ̥ə-naː/ concoct, forge
गर्ज Suffix ; ! /ɡərd͡ʒə-naː/ send
गाड़ Suffix ; ! /ɡaːɽ-naː/ plant, bury
गिना Suffix ; ! /ɡinaː-naː/ tick off <something>
गुजर Suffix ; ! /ɡud͡ʒrə-naː/ undergo, pass by
गुज़ार Suffix ; ! /ɡuzaːr-naː/ while away
गूंथ Suffix ; ! /ɡuːntʰ-naː/ braid, quill
घट Suffix ; ! /ɡ̤əʈ-naː/ scene, recede
घसीट Suffix ; ! /ɡ̤əsiːʈ-naː/ scrabble, drag
घुम Suffix ; ! /ɡ̤um-naː/ face, turn
घुस Suffix ; ! /ɡ̤us-naː/ search, enter
घेर Suffix ; ! /ɡ̤er-naː/ rail in, ring
घोंप Suffix ; ! /ɡ̤omp-naː/ knife
चटक Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃəʈkə-naː/ crack
चढ़ Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃəɽ̥ə-naː/ transcend, soar
चबा Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃəbaː-naː/ chew, masticate
चरमरा Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃərməraː-naː/ squeak, scrunch
चहक Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃəɦkə-naː/ twitter, chitter
चिचिया Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃit͡ʃijaː-naː/ yell
चिढ़ा Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃiɽ̥aː-naː/ taunt, twit
चिंघाड़ Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃiŋɡ̤aːɽ-naː/ trumpet
चुग Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃuɡ-naː/ pick, peck
चुभ Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃub̤-naː/ nip, prickle
चूम Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃuːm-naː/ kiss
चौंका Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃɔːŋkaː-naː/ jump
छपा Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃʰəpaː-naː/ print
छान Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃʰaːn-naː/ filter
छाँट Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃʰãːʈə-naː/ dress, sort
छिप Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃʰip-naː/ shelter, keep down
छींक Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃʰiːŋk-naː/ sneeze
छुपा Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃʰupaː-naː/ bury, cover
छेड़ Suffix ; ! /t͡ʃʰeɽ-naː/ accost, tamper
जग Suffix ; ! /d͡ʒəɡ-naː/ awake
जता Suffix ; ! /d͡ʒətaː-naː/ demonstrate, prompt
जमा Suffix ; ! /d͡ʒəmaː-naː/ adjust, solidify
जान Suffix ; ! /d͡ʒaːn-naː/ discern
जिला Suffix ; ! /d͡ʒilaː-naː/ animate, enliven
जुटा Suffix ; ! /d͡ʒuʈaː-naː/ provide, work up
जूट Suffix ; ! /d͡ʒuːʈ-naː/ march
झकझोर Suffix ; ! /d͡ʒ̤əkd͡ʒ̤or-naː/ rack, move
झड़ Suffix ; ! /d͡ʒ̤əɽ-naː/ brush, fall
झाड़ Suffix ; ! /d͡ʒ̤aːɽ-naː/ flick, dust
झिझक Suffix ; ! /d͡ʒ̤id͡ʒ̤kə-naː/ hang back
झुठला Suffix ; ! /d͡ʒ̤uʈʰlaː-naː/ belie
झुंझला Suffix ; ! /d͡ʒ̤uɲd͡ʒ̤laː-naː/ rage, to get irritated
झोंक Suffix ; ! /d͡ʒ̤oŋk-naː/ pelt
टपका Suffix ; ! /ʈəpkaː-naː/ dribble, drip
टाल Suffix ; ! /ʈaːl-naː/ wish on, procrastinate
टिका Suffix ; ! /ʈikaː-naː/ brace, rest
टोक Suffix ; ! /ʈok-naː/ take up, interject
ठुकरा Suffix ; ! /ʈʰukraː-naː/ scorn, spurn
ठेल Suffix ; ! /ʈʰel-naː/ push, wheel
डगमगा Suffix ; ! /ɖəɡməɡaː-naː/ careen, waver
डस Suffix ; ! /ɖəs-naː/ bite, sting
डिग Suffix ; ! /ɖiɡ-naː/ aberrate, budge
डुबो Suffix ; ! /ɖubo-naː/ dabble
डोल Suffix ; ! /ɖol-naː/ oscillate, rock
ढल Suffix ; ! /ɖ̤əl-naː/ descend, decline
ढाल Suffix ; ! /ɖ̤aːl-naː/ work, douse
ढूँढ़ Suffix ; ! /ɖ̤ũːɽ̥ə-naː/ rake, find
तड़प Suffix ; ! /təɽpə-naː/ squirm, yearn
तरस Suffix ; ! /tərsə-naː/ yearn, yen
तलाश Suffix ; ! /təlaːʃ-naː/ grope
ताप Suffix ; ! /taːp-naː/ warm
तैरा Suffix ; ! /tæːraː-naː/ float, waft
तौल Suffix ; ! /tɔːl-naː/ measure, weigh out
थपक Suffix ; ! /tʰəpkə-naː/ rock, tip
थमा Suffix ; ! /tʰəmaː-naː/ carry
थोप Suffix ; ! /tʰop-naː/ press, fasten
दफ़ना Suffix ; ! /dəfnaː-naː/ lay <somebody> to rest, bury
दर्शा Suffix ; ! /dərʃaː-naː/ peg, outline
दाग Suffix ; ! /daːɡ-naː/ speak, cauterise
दिखला Suffix ; ! /dikʰlaː-naː/ develop
दुखा Suffix ; ! /dukʰaː-naː/ torment, lacerate
देख Suffix ; ! /dekʰ-naː/ thumb, set eyes on
दोहरा Suffix ; ! /doɦraː-naː/ rehearse, ingeminate
दौड़ा Suffix ; ! /dɔːɽaː-naː/ run, start
धमका Suffix ; ! /d̤əmkaː-naː/ hector, lift <one> hand against
नकार Suffix ; ! /nəkaːr-naː/ negate, deny
 Suffix ; ! /-naː/ season, pick up
निकलवा Suffix ; ! /nikləvaː-naː/ have out, take out
निचोड़ Suffix ; ! /nit͡ʃoɽ-naː/ press, wring out
निबट Suffix ; ! /nibʈə-naː/ stem
निरा Suffix ; ! /niraː-naː/ weed, weed out
पकड़ Suffix ; ! /pəkɽə-naː/ apprehend, halter
पचा Suffix ; ! /pət͡ʃaː-naː/ carry, stomach
पटा Suffix ; ! /pəʈaː-naː/ liquidate, shorten
पढ़ Suffix ; ! /pəɽ̥ə-naː/ read, decipher
पढ़ा Suffix ; ! /pəɽ̥aː-naː/ coach, school
पहचान Suffix ; ! /pəɦt͡ʃaːn-naː/ recognize, recognise
पहुँचा Suffix ; ! /pəɦəũt͡ʃaː-naː/ deliver, give
पिट Suffix ; ! /piʈ-naː/ come off badly
पुचकार Suffix ; ! /put͡ʃkaːr-naː/ fondle, caress
पूरा Suffix ; ! /puːraː-naː/ do
पोंछ Suffix ; ! /poɲt͡ʃʰ-naː/ dry up, pat
फहरा Suffix ; ! /pʰəɦraː-naː/ unfurl, hoist
फिसल Suffix ; ! /pʰislə-naː/ slide, skid
फूँक Suffix ; ! /pʰũːkə-naː/ blow, insufflate
फोड़ Suffix ; ! /pʰoɽ-naː/ break, burst
बज Suffix ; ! /bəd͡ʒ-naː/ play, set off
बढ़ Suffix ; ! /bəɽ̥ə-naː/ advance, bring on
बन Suffix ; ! /bən-naː/ make, come out
बरसा Suffix ; ! /bərsaː-naː/ snow, shower
बांट Suffix ; ! /baːnʈ-naː/ parcel out, dole <something> out
बिगड़ Suffix ; ! /biɡɽə-naː/ fall, pack up
बिता Suffix ; ! /bitaː-naː/ while away, pass
बुझ Suffix ; ! /bud͡ʒ̤-naː/ blow out
बेच Suffix ; ! /bet͡ʃ-naː/ clear, flog
बँध Suffix ; ! /bə̃d̤ə-naː/ contract, tie <something> up
भड़क Suffix ; ! /b̤əɽkə-naː/ flare
भिगा Suffix ; ! /b̤iɡaː-naː/ drench
भींच Suffix ; ! /b̤iːɲt͡ʃ-naː/ squeeze, clench
भोज Suffix ; ! /b̤od͡ʒ-naː/ participate
मढ़ Suffix ; ! /məɽ̥ə-naː/ impute, mount
मरोड़ Suffix ; ! /məroɽ-naː/ wrench, twist
मार Suffix ; ! /maːr-naː/ plug, hit
मिल Suffix ; ! /mil-naː/ match, meet up
मुस्का Suffix ; ! /muskaː-naː/ flash
मंगवा Suffix ; ! /məŋɡvaː-naː/ send for
रख् Suffix ; ! /rəkʰ-naː/ get
रिस Suffix ; ! /ris-naː/ trickle, seep
रो Suffix ; ! /ro-naː/ in tears, bay
लटका Suffix ; ! /ləʈkaː-naː/ drape, hang up
लपेट Suffix ; ! /ləpeʈ-naː/ intertwine, tuck
लिखवा Suffix ; ! /likʰvaː-naː/ dictate
लुढ़का Suffix ; ! /luɽ̥əkaː-naː/ bowl, roll
वसूल Suffix ; ! /vəsuːl-naː/ raise
सड़ा Suffix ; ! /səɽaː-naː/ rot, sour
सम्भाल Suffix ; ! /səmb̤aːl-naː/ support, see
सान Suffix ; ! /saːn-naː/ knead
सिल Suffix ; ! /sil-naː/ tailor, tick
सुझा Suffix ; ! /sud͡ʒ̤aː-naː/ work up, work out
सुलझ Suffix ; ! /suld͡ʒ̤ə-naː/ untangle, unscramble
से Suffix ; ! /se-naː/ brood, sit
संजो Suffix ; ! /səɲd͡ʒo-naː/ arrange, cherish
स्वीकार Suffix ; ! /sviːkaːr-naː/ admit, acknowledge
हांक Suffix ; ! /ɦaːŋk-naː/ urge, whip on
हो Suffix ; ! /ɦo-naː/ turn, flow from
अलाप Suffix ;
आन Suffix ;
उघाड Suffix ;
उतर Suffix ;
उभर Suffix ;
ओढ़ा Suffix ;
कर Suffix ;
कुचल Suffix ;
खटखटा Suffix ;
खिसक Suffix ;
खोज Suffix ;
गडबडा Suffix ;
गिना Suffix ;
गूंज Suffix ;
घिर Suffix ;
चढ़ Suffix ;
चला Suffix ;
चुन Suffix ;
चढ़ा Suffix ;
छांटने Suffix ;
छिड़क Suffix ;
छू Suffix ;
जगमगा Suffix ;
जा Suffix ;
जुट Suffix ;
जोड़ Suffix ;
झुठला Suffix ;
टाल Suffix ;
ठान Suffix ;
डाल Suffix ;
ढह Suffix ;
तन Suffix ;
तुल Suffix ;
थक Suffix ;
थिरक Suffix ;
दाग Suffix ;
दे Suffix ;
धर Suffix ;
नाप Suffix ;
निबट Suffix ;
पचा Suffix ;
परख Suffix ;
पहुँचा Suffix ;
पिरो Suffix ;
पड़ Suffix ;
फिर Suffix ;
फूल Suffix ;
बंट Suffix ;
बढ Suffix ;
बनवा Suffix ;
बह Suffix ;
बिखेर Suffix ;
बिफर Suffix ;
बेच Suffix ;
बढ़ाएं Suffix ;
भांज Suffix ;
भुला Suffix ;
मंझे Suffix ;
मना Suffix ;
मिट Suffix ;
मोह Suffix ;
रटा Suffix ;
रूठ Suffix ;
लगा Suffix ;
ललकार Suffix ;
लिखवा Suffix ;
ले Suffix ;
सँवार Suffix ;
सड Suffix ;
सरक Suffix ;
सिखा Suffix ;
सुन Suffix ;
सूख Suffix ;
हंस Suffix ;
हिल Suffix ;
